Utah statutes.
10-7-76.   Payment of witness fees and mileage.

Whenever a criminal action arising out of the violation of a city or town ordinance is tried on appeal, the per diems and mileage of witnesses for the prosecution shall be paid out of the treasury of the city or town in which such action originated.

